Utah statutes.
38-11-206.   Limitations on fund balance -- Payment of special assessments.
(1) (a)  If  on December 31 of any year the balance in the fund is less than
$1,500,000, the  division shall make a special assessment against all
qualified beneficiaries in an amount that will restore the unencumbered fund
balance to not less than $2,000,000 or more than $2,500,000.
(b)  The amount of the special assessment shall be determined by the division
under Section 63J-1-504 after consultation with the board.
(2)  Special assessments made under this section shall be due and payable on
May 1 following assessment.
(3)  The fund balance limitations set forth in Subsection (1)(a) shall be used
by the division only for the purpose of determining the amount of any special
assessment and do not prohibit the fund balance from exceeding $2,500,000 or
falling below $2,000,000.
